Virginia statutes. Title 17.1. Courts of Record.
Article 5. Master and Incorporating Deeds of Trust.

§ 17.1-259.
Recordation of master deed of trust; form and requisites.

Any person may record in any clerk’s office in the Commonwealth where deeds are recorded a form of a deed of trust, hereinafter referred to as a “master deed.”

The master deed shall bear the caption “Master Deed of Trust,” and may contain any provisions not in conflict with law. The provisions shall be numbered or lettered, clearly distinguishable one from the other, and susceptible of exact reference.

History.

1954, c. 8, §§ 17-83.2, 17-83.3; 1998, c. 872.

§ 17.1-260.
Recordation, effect and requisites of incorporating deed.

Any person may record a deed of trust hereinafter referred to as an “incorporating deed,” which incorporates by reference any one or more of the provisions of a master deed recorded in the same clerk’s office. The provisions incorporated by reference shall be of the same force and effect and shall be as binding upon the parties to the incorporating deed and their successors in title as if fully set forth in the incorporating deed. No incorporating deed shall refer to more than one master deed.

History.

1954, c. 8, § 17-83.4; 1998, c. 872.